Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.12
Designated family member, defined.

Designated family
member means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of
the owner of a new motor vehicle dealership who, in the case of the owner's
death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in the new motor vehicle
dealership under the terms of the owner's will, who has been nominated in
any other written instrument, or who, in the case of an incapacitated owner
of such dealership, has been appointed by a court as the legal representative
of the new motor vehicle dealer's property.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 24.